Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1519.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 46.17.040 and 2019 c 417 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director shall collect a service fee of:(a) ((Fifteen dollars))$18 for changes in a certificate of title, changes in ownership for nontitled vehicles, or for verification of record and preparation of an affidavit of lost title other than at the time of the certificate of title application or transfer, in addition to any other fees or taxes due at the time of application; and(b) ((Eight dollars))$11 for a registration renewal, issuing a transit permit, or any other service under this section, in addition to any other fees or taxes due at the time of application.(2) Service fees collected under this section by the department or county auditor or other agent appointed by the director must be credited to the capital vessel replacement account under RCW 47.60.322.Sec. 2. RCW 46.17.005 and 2019 c 417 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A person who applies for a vehicle registration or for any other right to operate a vehicle on the highways of this state shall pay a ((four dollar and fifty cent))$6 filing fee in addition to any other fees and taxes required by law.(2) A person who applies for a certificate of title shall pay a ((five dollar and fifty cent))$6.50 filing fee in addition to any other fees and taxes required by law.(3) The filing fees established in this section must be distributed under RCW 46.68.400.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. This act applies to registrations that are due or become due on or after January 1, 2026, and certificate of title transactions that are processed on or after January 1, 2026.--- END ---